Hawaii statutes.
[§304A-2270] Hawaiian language college
revolving fund. There is established the Hawaiian language college
revolving fund into which revenues from the sale of Hawaiian language materials
shall be deposited. Moneys deposited into this fund shall be expended to
support the Hawaiian language college at the University of Hawaii at Hilo
established under section [304A-1301]. [L 2006, c 75, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next